Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB6003.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 1. This act may be cited as the "deluxe second home surcharge act". Sec. 3. As used in this act: (a) "Deluxe second home" means a residential property that meets both of the following requirements: (i) Is non-owner-occupied. (ii) Has a true cash value of $1,000,000.00 or more. (b) "Department" means the department of treasury. (c) "Non-owner-occupied" means that the residential property does not serve as the owner's principal residence and is not occupied by the owner of the property for a majority of days during a given tax year. (d) "Owner" means 1 of the following: (i) Except as otherwise provided in subparagraph (ii), the person that holds legal title to the property. (ii) If a land contract exists, the most recent land contract vendee. (e) "Person" means an individual or a partnership, corporation, limited liability company, association, or other legal entity. (f) "Principal residence" means that term as defined in section 7dd of the general property tax act, 1893 PA 206, MCL 211.7dd. (g) "Reimbursement fund" means the reimbursement fund created in section 11. (h) "Residential property" means real property classified as residential real property under section 34c of the general property tax act, 1893 PA 206, MCL 211.34c. (i) "Surcharge" means the surcharge imposed under section 5. (j) "Tax year" means the tax year of the owner of a deluxe second home under the income tax act of 1967, 1967 PA 281, MCL 206.1 to 206.847. (k) "True cash value" means that term as defined in section 27 of the general property tax act, 1893 PA 206, MCL 211.27. Sec. 5. (1) For the 2027 tax year and each tax year thereafter, an annual surcharge is imposed on deluxe second homes. (2) The surcharge is in addition to any other taxes, charges, assessments, or fees. (3) The rate of the surcharge is as follows: (a) If the true cash value of the deluxe second home is $1,000,000.00 or more but less than $2,000,000.00, the rate of the surcharge is 2% of the difference between the true cash value of the deluxe second home and $1,000,000.00. (b) If the true cash value of the deluxe second home is $2,000,000.00 or more but less than $3,000,000.00, the rate of the surcharge is 3% of the difference between the true cash value of the deluxe second home and $1,000,000.00. (c) If the true cash value of the deluxe second home is $3,000,000.00 or more but less than $4,000,000.00, the rate of the surcharge is 4% of the difference between the true cash value of the deluxe second home and $1,000,000.00. (d) If the true cash value of the deluxe second home is $4,000,000.00 or more, the rate of the surcharge is 5% of the difference between the true cash value of the deluxe second home and $1,000,000.00. Sec. 7. (1) The department shall collect the surcharge at the same time and in the same manner as the tax imposed under the income tax act of 1967, 1967 PA 281, MCL 206.1 to 206.847. (2) The department shall administer the surcharge pursuant to 1941 PA 122, MCL 205.1 to 205.31, and this act. If 1941 PA 122, MCL 205.1 to 205.31, and this act conflict, this act applies. (3) Not later than 180 days after the effective date of this act, the department shall prescribe and publish on its website a form to be used for calculating the amount of the surcharge owed under this act. The department may prescribe any other forms necessary for the administration of this act. (4) The department may promulgate rules to implement this act pursuant to the administrative procedures act of 1969, 1969 PA 306, MCL 24.201 to 24.328. Sec. 9. All surcharges, penalties, and costs paid to the department under this act must be deposited in the state treasury and credited to the reimbursement fund. Sec. 11. (1) The reimbursement fund is created in the state treasury. (2) The state treasurer shall deposit money and other assets received under section 9 or from any other source in the reimbursement fund. The state treasurer shall direct the investment of money in the reimbursement fund and credit interest and earnings from the investments to the reimbursement fund. (3) Money in the reimbursement fund at the close of the fiscal year remains in the reimbursement fund and does not lapse to the general fund. (4) The department is the administrator of the reimbursement fund for audits of the fund. (5) The department of shall expend money from the reimbursement fund, on appropriation, only for the following purposes: (a) To compensate the state school aid fund for qualified revenue lost. (b) After the distribution under subdivision (a), to compensate municipalities for qualified revenue lost. If the money in the reimbursement fund is insufficient to fully compensate all municipalities for qualified revenue lost, payments from the reimbursement fund must be prorated amongst those municipalities. (c) After the distributions under subdivisions (a) and (b), to compensate this state for all of the following: (i) Revenue lost as a result of the expansion of the credits under sections 520 and 522 of the income tax act of 1967, 1967 PA 281, MCL 206.520 and 206.522, by the amendatory act that increased the total credit allowed under those sections, as provided in section 520(15) of the income tax act of 1967, 1967 PA 281, MCL 206.520, from $1,500.00 to $2,500.00. (ii) The cost of the online property tax calculator described in section 42c of the general property tax act, 1893 PA 206, MCL 211.42c. (d) After the distributions under subdivisions (a) to (c), to compensate local tax collecting units that provide members of the public free and readily accessible online information regarding property taxes as described in section 42b of the general property tax act, 1893 PA 206, MCL 211.42b. (6) As used in this section: (a) "Municipality" means that term as defined in section 5 of the local community stabilization authority act, 2014 PA 86, MCL 123.1345. (b) "Qualified revenue lost" means revenue lost during the immediately preceding property tax year because of the following, as determined by the department: (i) The exemption under section 7yy of the general property tax act, 1893 PA 206, MCL 211.7yy. (ii) The expansion of the exemption under section 7u of the general property tax act, 1893 PA 206, MCL 211.7u, by the amendatory act that added section 7u(2)(e)(iii) of the general property tax act, 1893 PA 206, MCL 211.7u. (iii) The exclusion of remodeling or renovation from true cash value under section 27(9) of the general property tax act, 1893 PA 206, MCL 211.27. (c) "State school aid fund" means the state school aid fund established by section 11 of article IX of the state constitution of 1963. Enacting section 1. This act does not take effect unless all of the following bills of the 103rd Legislature are enacted into law: (a) House Bill No. 5999 (request no. H05415'25). (b) House Bill No. 5997 (request no. H05460'25). (c) House Bill No. 5996 (request no. H05514'25). (d) House Bill No. 5998 (request no. H05687'25). (e) House Bill No. 6001 (request no. H06034'26). (f) House Bill No. 6000 (request no. H06038'26).